Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Chapter 1 Administration

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2001, House Joint Resolution No. 1, §§ 1 through 3, requests that Congress not reintroduce threatened or endangered species into the state of Wyoming without the consent and approval of the state and without providing the necessary funding.

Laws 2001, Senate Joint Resolution No. 4, §§ 1 through 4, requests that Congress establish a Northern Rocky Mountain Grizzly Bear and Gray Wolf Management Trust to fund the management of these wildlife populations and provide compensation payment for losses incurred by individuals and entities made by state and federal entities arising out of continuing management of grizzly bear and gray wolf populations in the Northern Rocky Mountain region. The legislature requests the U.S. Congress to fund the corpus of the trust with a minimum of $40,000,000 by January 1, 2003 and encourages that individuals, businesses, corporations, and organizations across the country to contribute to the corpus.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, §§ 1 to 4, requests Congress to direct all federal authorities responsible for wolf reintroduction in the state to manage wolves so that the elk, moose and deer population, moose and deer habitats and elk feeding grounds are preserved and to annually reimburse the state for the loss of elk, moose and deer to wolves.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Endangered Species Act and Private Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 479 (1997).